Utah statutes.
26-40-108.   Funding.

(1)  The program shall be funded by federal matching funds received under, together with state matching funds required by, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397ee.

(2)  Program expenditures in the following categories may not exceed 10% in the aggregate of all federal payments pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397ee:

(a)  other forms of child health assistance for children with gross family incomes below 200% of the federal poverty level;

(b)  other health services initiatives to improve low-income children's health;

(c)  outreach program expenditures; and

(d)  administrative costs.



Amended by Chapter 391, 2010 General Session

